Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5803.13
Rehabilitation bed, defined.

Rehabilitation bed means a bed in a health care facility that is or will be licensed under the Health Care Facility Licensure Act if the bed is in an inpatient facility which is operated for the primary purpose of assisting in the rehabilitation of disabled persons through an integrated program of medical and other services which are provided under professional supervision and if the bed is part of a hospital or unit of a hospital that is excluded from the prospective payment system under Title XVIII of the federal Social Security Act as a rehabilitation hospital or rehabilitation unit.

Laws 1982, LB 378, § 9;

R.S.1943, (1996), § 71-5818.01;

Laws 1997, LB 798, § 17;

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 119.

Health Care Facility Licensure Act, see section 71-401.